Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4119.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0693, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Renters. (a) A taxpayer whose rent constituting property taxes exceeds the percentage of the household income stated below must pay an amount equal to the percent of income shown for the appropriate household income level along with the percent paid by claimant of the remaining amount of rent constituting property taxes. The credit under subdivision 2 equals the amount of rent constituting property taxes that remain, up to the maximum credit amount shown below. Household Income Percent of Income Percent paid by claimant Maximum Credit $0 to deleted text begin 6,479deleted text end new text begin 6,819new text end 1.0 percent deleted text begin 5deleted text end new text begin 2.5new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,640 deleted text end new text begin 2,780 new text end deleted text begin 6,480 to 8,609 deleted text end new text begin 6,820 to 9,059 new text end 1.0 percent deleted text begin 10deleted text end new text begin 5new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,640 deleted text end new text begin 2,780 new text end deleted text begin 8,610 to 10,759 deleted text end new text begin 9,060 to 11,319 new text end 1.1 percent deleted text begin 10deleted text end new text begin 5new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,570 deleted text end new text begin 2,700 new text end deleted text begin 10,760 to 15,089 deleted text end new text begin 11,320 to 15,879 new text end 1.2 percent deleted text begin 10deleted text end new text begin 5new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,510 deleted text end new text begin 2,640 new text end deleted text begin 15,090 to 19,399 deleted text end new text begin 15,880 to 20,409 new text end 1.3 percent deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 10new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,430 deleted text end new text begin 2,560 new text end deleted text begin 19,400 to 21,539 deleted text end new text begin 20,410 to 22,669 new text end 1.4 percent deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 10new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,370 deleted text end new text begin 2,490 new text end deleted text begin 21,540 to 23,679 deleted text end new text begin 22,670 to 24,919 new text end 1.4 percent deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 15new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,310 deleted text end new text begin 2,430 new text end deleted text begin 23,680 to 28,009 deleted text end new text begin 24,920 to 29,469 new text end 1.5 percent deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 15new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,240 deleted text end new text begin 2,360 new text end deleted text begin 28,010 to 30,159 deleted text end new text begin 29,470 to 31,739 new text end 1.6 percent deleted text begin 20deleted text end new text begin 15new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 30,160 to 32,309 deleted text end new text begin 31,740 to 33,999 new text end 1.7 percent deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 20new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 32,310 to 36,629 deleted text end new text begin 34,000 to 38,539 new text end 1.8 percent deleted text begin 25deleted text end new text begin 20new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 36,630 to 38,769 deleted text end new text begin 38,540 to 40,799 new text end 1.9 percent deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 25new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 38,770 to 45,229 deleted text end new text begin 40,800 to 47,589 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 25new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 45,230 to 51,689 deleted text end new text begin 47,590 to 54,389 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 35deleted text end new text begin 30new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 51,690 to 60,319 deleted text end new text begin 54,390 to 63,469 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 40deleted text end new text begin 35new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,180 deleted text end new text begin 2,290 new text end deleted text begin 60,320 to 62,459 deleted text end new text begin 63,470 to 65,719 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 45deleted text end new text begin 40new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,980 deleted text end new text begin 2,080 new text end deleted text begin 62,460 to 64,619 deleted text end new text begin 65,720 to 67,999 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 45deleted text end new text begin 40new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,780 deleted text end new text begin 1,870 new text end deleted text begin 64,620 to 66,789 deleted text end new text begin 68,000 to 70,279 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 45deleted text end new text begin 40new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,510 deleted text end new text begin 1,590 new text end deleted text begin 66,790 to 68,929 deleted text end new text begin 70,280 to 72,529 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 45new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,320 deleted text end new text begin 1,390 new text end deleted text begin 68,930 to 71,089 deleted text end new text begin 72,530 to 74,809 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 45new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,190 deleted text end new text begin 1,250 new text end deleted text begin 71,090 to 73,239 deleted text end new text begin 74,810 to 77,069 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 45new text end percent $ deleted text begin 660 deleted text end new text begin 690 new text end deleted text begin 73,240 to 75,389 deleted text end new text begin 77,070 to 79,329 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 50deleted text end new text begin 45new text end percent $ deleted text begin 260 deleted text end new text begin 270 new text end The credit is the amount calculated under this subdivision. No credit is allowed if the taxpayer's household income is deleted text begin $75,389deleted text end new text begin $79,330new text end or more. (b) The commissioner must annually adjust the dollar amounts of the income thresholds and the maximum refunds in paragraph (a), as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is deleted text begin 2024deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . (c) The commissioner shall construct and make available to taxpayers a comprehensive table showing the rent constituting property taxes to be paid and refund allowed at various levels of income and assessment. The table shall follow the schedule of income percentages, maximums, and other provisions specified in paragraph (a), except that the commissioner may graduate the transition between income brackets. All refunds shall be computed in accordance with tables prepared and issued by the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290A.04, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Homeowners; homestead credit refund. A claimant whose property taxes payable are in excess of the percentage of the household income stated below shall pay an amount equal to the percent of income shown for the appropriate household income level along with the percent to be paid by the claimant of the remaining amount of property taxes payable. The state refund equals the amount of property taxes payable that remain, up to the state refund amount shown below. Household Income Percent of Income Percent Paid byClaimant Maximum StateRefund $0 to deleted text begin 2,079deleted text end new text begin 2,249new text end 1.0 percent deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin 7new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 2,080 to 4,139 deleted text end new text begin 2,250 to 4,469 new text end 1.1 percent deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin 7new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 4,140 to 6,269 deleted text end new text begin 4,470 to 6,779 new text end 1.2 percent deleted text begin 12deleted text end new text begin 7new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 6,270 to 8,369 deleted text end new text begin 6,780 to 9,049 new text end 1.3 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 8,370 to 10,439 deleted text end new text begin 9,050 to 11,279 new text end 1.4 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 10,440 to 14,619 deleted text end new text begin 11,280 to 15,799 new text end 1.5 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 14,620 to 16,689 deleted text end new text begin 15,800 to 18,039 new text end 1.6 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 16,690 to 18,799 deleted text end new text begin 18,040 to 20,319 new text end 1.7 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 18,800 to 20,879 deleted text end new text begin 20,320 to 22,559 new text end 1.8 percent deleted text begin 17deleted text end new text begin 12new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 20,880 to 22,949 deleted text end new text begin 20,560 to 24,799 new text end 1.9 percent deleted text begin 22deleted text end new text begin 17new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 22,950 to 29,239 deleted text end new text begin 24,800 to 31,599 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 22deleted text end new text begin 17new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 29,240 to 31,319 deleted text end new text begin 31,600 to 33,849 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 27deleted text end new text begin 22new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 31,320 to 35,509 deleted text end new text begin 33,850 to 38,379 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 27deleted text end new text begin 22new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 35,510 to 50,099 deleted text end new text begin 38,380 to 54,139 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 32deleted text end new text begin 27new text end percent $ deleted text begin 3,310 deleted text end new text begin 3,580 new text end deleted text begin 50,100 to 73,059 deleted text end new text begin 54,140 to 78,959 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 32deleted text end new text begin 27new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,680 deleted text end new text begin 2,900 new text end deleted text begin 73,060 to 83,499 deleted text end new text begin 78,960 to 90,239 new text end 2.0 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 32new text end percent $ deleted text begin 2,350 deleted text end new text begin 2,540 new text end deleted text begin 83,500 to 93,939 deleted text end new text begin 90,240 to 101,519 new text end 2.1 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 32new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,940 deleted text end new text begin 2,100 new text end deleted text begin 93,940 to 104,379 deleted text end new text begin 101,520 to 112,799 new text end 2.2 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 32new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,740 deleted text end new text begin 1,880 new text end deleted text begin 104,380 to 114,819 deleted text end new text begin 112,800 to 124,089 new text end 2.3 percent deleted text begin 37deleted text end new text begin 32new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,520 deleted text end new text begin 1,640 new text end deleted text begin 114,820 to 121,089 deleted text end new text begin 124,090 to 130,859 new text end 2.4 percent deleted text begin 42deleted text end new text begin 37new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,280 deleted text end new text begin 1,380 new text end deleted text begin 121,090 to 125,289 deleted text end new text begin 130,860 to 135,399 new text end 2.5 percent deleted text begin 42deleted text end new text begin 37new text end percent $ deleted text begin 1,070 deleted text end new text begin 1,160 new text end deleted text begin 125,290 to 130,349 deleted text end new text begin 135,400 to 140,869 new text end 2.5 percent deleted text begin 47deleted text end new text begin 42new text end percent $ deleted text begin 870 deleted text end new text begin 940 new text end deleted text begin 130,350 to 135,409 deleted text end new text begin 140,870 to 146,339 new text end 2.5 percent deleted text begin 47deleted text end new text begin 42new text end percent $ deleted text begin 650 deleted text end new text begin 700 new text end The payment made to a claimant shall be the amount of the state refund calculated under this subdivision. No payment is allowed if the claimant's household income is deleted text begin $135,410deleted text end new text begin $146,340new text end or more. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with refunds based on property taxes payable in 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290A.04, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Inflation adjustment. The commissioner shall annually adjust the dollar amounts of the income thresholds and the maximum refunds under subdivision 2 as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is deleted text begin 2023deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective beginning with refunds based on property taxes payable in 2027. new text end